tests/cases.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "Case front-vowel final": 
    ийэ<n><sg><nom> : ийэ
    ийэ<n><sg><acc> : ийэни
    ийэ<n><sg><par> : ийэтэ
    ийэ<n><sg><dat> : ийэҕэ
    ийэ<n><sg><abl> : ийэттэн
    ийэ<n><sg><ins> : ийэнэн
    ийэ<n><sg><com> : ийэлиин
    ийэ<n><sg><comp> : ийэтээҕэр
    кинигэ<n><sg><dat> : кинигэҕэ

  "Case back-vowel cons-final": 
    уот<n><sg><nom> : уот
    уот<n><sg><acc> : уоту
    уот<n><sg><par> : уотта
    уот<n><sg><dat> : уокка
    уот<n><sg><abl> : уоттан
    уот<n><sg><ins> : уотунан
    уот<n><sg><com> : уоттуун
    уот<n><sg><comp> : уоттааҕар

  "Case back-vowel cons-final 2": 
    ох<n><sg><nom> : ох
    ох<n><sg><acc> : оҕу
    ох<n><sg><par> : охто
    ох<n><sg><dat> : оххо
    ох<n><sg><abl> : охтон
    ох<n><sg><ins> : оҕунан
    ох<n><sg><com> : охтуун
    ох<n><sg><comp> : охтооҕор
